Maryland, session 2025, HB0131.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
9–1108.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Nitrogen removal technology” has the meaning stated in § 9–1108 of
this subtitle.
(3) “On–site sewage disposal system” has the meaning stated in § 9–1108
of this subtitle.
(4) “Vendor” means a person that sells, offers for sale, or distributes
on–site sewage disposal systems that utilize nitrogen removal technology.
(b) (1) In accordance with subsection (c) of this section, the Department shall
evaluate and rank all best available nitrogen removal technologies for on–site sewage
disposal systems to advise local governments and residents of the State of approved
technologies that qualify for funding under § 9–1605.2(h)(2) of this title.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT MAY USE THE EVALUATION AND RANKING
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION TO ESTABLISH PERFORMANCE–BASED
FUNDING LEVELS FOR EACH BEST AVAILABLE NITROGEN REMOVAL TECHNOLOGY
FOR ON–SITE SEWAGE DISPOSAL SYSTEMS THAT QUALIFIES FOR FUNDING UNDER §
9–1605.2(H)(2) OF THIS TITLE.
(3) The Department shall:
(i) Make available the evaluation [and], ranking, AND ELIGIBLE
FUNDING LEVELS of all best available nitrogen removal technologies required under this
section on the Department’s [Web site] WEBSITE; and
(ii) Provide the evaluation [and], ranking, AND ELIGIBLE
FUNDING LEVELS of all best available nitrogen removal technologies to a county,
municipality, or resident of the State in any correspondence relating to approved
technologies that qualify for funding under § 9–1605.2(h)(2) of this title.
(c) The Department shall evaluate and rank all best available nitrogen removal
technologies for on–site sewage disposal systems based on:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 461
(1) The total amount of nitrogen reduction the technology can achieve;
(2) The total cost of the technology, including the estimated annual cost of
operation and maintenance, including electricity costs;
(3) The cost per pound of the nitrogen reduction; and
(4) Any other information the Department determines is necessary.
(d) Beginning June 1, 2011, and every 2 years thereafter, the Department shall
request information from vendors necessary to carry out the requirements of this section.
9–1605.2.
(a) (1) There is a Bay Restoration Fund.
(h) (1) With regard to the funds collected under subsection (b)(1)(i)1 of this
section from users of an on–site sewage disposal system or holding tank that receive a water
bill and subsection (b)(1)(i)2 and 3 of this section, beginning in fiscal year 2006, the
Comptroller shall:
(i) Establish a separate account within the Bay Restoration Fund;
and
(ii) Disburse the funds as provided under paragraph (2) of this
subsection.
(2) The Comptroller shall:
(i) Deposit 60% of the funds in the separate account to be used for:
1. Subject to paragraphs (3), (4), (5), and (6) of this
subsection, with priority first given to failing systems and holding tanks located in the
Chesapeake and Atlantic Coastal Bays Critical Area [and then], SECOND to failing
systems that ARE LOCATED WITHIN THE WATERSHED OF A NITROGEN–IMPAIRED
BODY OF WATER, AND THIRD A MARYLAND CHESAPEAKE BAY 8–DIGIT WATERSHED
THAT HAS A RELATIVE EFFECTIVENESS FOR TOTAL NITROGEN REDUCTION OF 9.24
OR HIGHER BASED ON THE CHESAPEAKE BAY WATERSHED MODEL, THIRD TO
FAILING SYSTEMS THAT ARE LOCATED WITHIN THE 500–YEAR FLOODPLAIN, AND
FOURTH TO FAILING SYSTEMS THAT the Department determines are a threat to public
health or water quality, grants or loans for up to 100% of:
A. The costs attributable to upgrading an on–site sewage
disposal system to the best available technology for the removal of nitrogen;
– 3 –

Ch. 461 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
B. The cost difference between a conventional on–site sewage
disposal system and a system that utilizes the best available technology for the removal of
nitrogen;
C. The cost of repairing or replacing a failing on–site sewage
disposal system with a system that uses the best available technology for nitrogen removal;
D. The cost, up to the sum of the costs authorized under item
B of this item for each individual system, of replacing multiple on–site sewage disposal
systems located in the same community with a new community sewerage system that is
owned by a local government and that meets enhanced nutrient removal standards; or
E. The cost, up to the sum of the costs authorized under item
C of this item for each individual system, of connecting a property using an on–site sewage
disposal system to an existing municipal wastewater facility that is achieving, or has signed
a funding agreement with the Department and is under construction to achieve, enhanced
nutrient removal or biological nutrient removal level treatment, including payment of the
principal, but not interest, of debt issued by a local government for such connection costs;
2. The reasonable costs of the Department, not to exceed 8%
of the funds deposited into the separate account, to:
A. Implement an education, outreach, and upgrade program
to advise owners of on–site sewage disposal systems and holding tanks on the proper
maintenance of the systems and tanks and the availability of grants and loans under item
1 of this item;
B. Review and approve the design and construction of on–site
sewage disposal system or holding tank upgrades;
C. Issue grants or loans as provided under item 1 of this item;
and
D. Provide technical support for owners of upgraded
on–site sewage disposal systems or holding tanks to operate and maintain the upgraded
systems;
3. A portion of the reasonable costs of a local public entity
that has been delegated by the Department under § 1–301(b) of this article to administer
and enforce environmental laws, not to exceed 10% of the funds deposited into the separate
account, to implement regulations adopted by the Department for on–site sewage disposal
systems that utilize the best available technology for the removal of nitrogen;
4. Subject to paragraph (7) of this subsection, financial
assistance to low–income homeowners, as defined by the Department, for up to 50% of the
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 461
cost of an operation and maintenance contract of up to 5 years for an on–site sewage
disposal system that utilizes nitrogen removal technology;
5. Subject to paragraph (8) of this subsection, a local
jurisdiction to provide financial assistance to eligible homeowners for the reasonable cost
of pumping out an on–site sewage disposal system, at least once every 5 years, unless a
more frequent pump out schedule is recommended during an inspection, not to exceed 10%
of the funds allocated to the local jurisdiction; and
6. In fiscal years 2020 and 2021, financial assistance to a
local jurisdiction for the development of a septic stewardship plan that meets the
requirements under paragraph (8)(iii)2 of this subsection; and
(ii) Transfer 40% of the funds to the Maryland Agriculture Water
Quality Cost Share Program in the Department of Agriculture in order to fund cover crop
activities.
(3) Funding for the costs identified in paragraph (2)(i)1 of this subsection
shall be provided in the following order of priority:
(i) For owners of all levels of income, the costs identified in
paragraph (2)(i)1A and B of this subsection; and
(ii) For [low–income] LOW– AND MODERATE–INCOME owners, as
defined by the Department, the costs identified in paragraph (2)(i)1C of this subsection:
1. First, for best available technologies for nitrogen removal;
and
2. Second, for other wastewater treatment systems.
(4) Funding for the costs identified in paragraph (2)(i)1D of this subsection
may be provided if:
(i) The environmental impact of the on–site sewage disposal system
is documented by the local government and confirmed by the Department;
(ii) It can be demonstrated that:
1. The replacement of the on–site sewage disposal system
with a new community sewerage system is more cost effective for nitrogen removal than
upgrading each individual on–site sewage disposal system; or
2. The individual replacement of the on–site sewage disposal
system is not feasible; and
– 5 –

Ch. 461 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iii) The new community sewerage system will only serve lots that
have received a certificate of occupancy, or equivalent certificate, [on or before October 1,
2008] AT LEAST 15 YEARS BEFORE JULY 1 OF THE YEAR IN WHICH THE APPLICATION
FOR FUNDING IS MADE.
(5) Funding for the costs identified in paragraph (2)(i)1E of this subsection
may be provided only if all of the following conditions are met:
(i) The environmental impact of the on–site sewage disposal system
is documented by the local government and confirmed by the Department;
(ii) It can be demonstrated that:
1. The replacement of the on–site sewage disposal system
with service to an existing municipal wastewater facility that is achieving, or has signed a
funding agreement with the Department and is under construction to achieve, enhanced
nutrient removal or biological nutrient removal level treatment is more cost–effective for
nitrogen removal than upgrading the individual on–site sewage disposal system; or
2. The individual replacement of the on–site sewage disposal
system is not feasible;
(iii) The project is consistent with the county’s comprehensive plan
and water and sewer master plan;
(iv) 1. The on–site sewage disposal system was installed [as of
October 1, 2008] AT LEAST 15 YEARS BEFORE JULY 1 OF THE YEAR IN WHICH THE
APPLICATION FOR FUNDING IS MADE, and the property the system serves is located in a
priority funding area, in accordance with § 5–7B–02 of the State Finance and Procurement
Article; or
2. The on–site sewage disposal system was installed [as of
October 1, 2008] AT LEAST 15 YEARS BEFORE JULY 1 OF THE YEAR IN WHICH THE
APPLICATION FOR FUNDING IS MADE, the property the system serves is not located in a
priority funding area, and the project meets the requirements under § 5–7B–06 of the State
Finance and Procurement Article and is consistent with a public health area of concern:
A. Identified in the county water and sewer plan; or
B. Certified by a county environmental health director with
concurrence by the Department and, if funding is approved, subsequently added to the
county water and sewer plan within a time frame jointly agreed on by the Department and
the county that takes into consideration the county’s water and sewer plan update and
amendment process; and
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 461
(v) The funding agreement for a project that meets the conditions for
funding under subparagraph (iv)2 of this paragraph includes provisions to ensure:
1. Denial of access for any future connections that are not
included in the project’s proposed service area; and
2. That the project will not unduly impede access to funding
for upgrading individual on–site sewage disposal systems in the county with best available
technology for nitrogen removal.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
11–203.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, this Division II does not
apply to:
(1) procurement by:
(xviii) the Department of Natural Resources, for negotiating or entering
into grants, agreements, or partnerships with nonprofit entities related to conservation
service opportunities; [and]
(xix) the State Archives for preservation, conservation, proper care,
restoration, and transportation of fine art or decorative art that is:
1. in the custody of the Commission on Artistic Property; and
2. owned by or loaned to the State; AND
(XX) THE DEPARTMENT OF THE ENVIRONMENT FOR BEST
AVAILABLE NITROGEN REMOVAL TECHNOLOGIES FOR ON–SITE SEWAGE DISPOSAL
SYSTEMS THAT QUALIFY FOR FUNDING UNDER § 9–1605(H)(2) OF THE
ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE, INCLUDING:
1. REQUESTING INFORMATION FROM VENDORS;
2. RANKING AND EVALUATING BEST AVAILABLE
TECHNOLOGIES; AND
3. ESTABLISHING PERFORMANCE–BASED FUNDING
LEVELS AS PROVIDED IN § 9–1108.1 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE;
(2) procurement by a unit from:
(i) another unit;
– 7 –

Ch. 461 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) a political subdivision of the State;
(iii) an agency of a political subdivision of the State;
(iv) a government, including the government of another state, of the
United States, or of another country;
(v) an agency or political subdivision of a government; or
(vi) a bistate, multistate, bicounty, or multicounty governmental
agency; or
(3) procurement in support of enterprise activities for the purpose of:
(i) direct resale; or
(ii) remanufacture and subsequent resale.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 8 –